Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 11, Chapter 321, O.S.L.
2022 (12 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 1439), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1439. The Oklahoma Citizens Participation Act shall not
apply to:
1. An enforcement action that is brought in the name of this
state or a political subdivision of this state by the Attorney
General or a district attorney;
2. A legal action brought against a person primarily engaged in
the business of selling or leasing goods or services, if the
statement or conduct the action is based upon arises out of the sale
or lease of goods, services, or an insurance product, insurance
services, or a commercial transaction in which the intended audience
is an actual or potential buyer or customer;
3. A legal action seeking recovery for bodily injury, wrongful
death or survival or to statements made regarding that legal action;
4. A legal action brought under the Oklahoma Insurance Code or
arising out of an insurance contract; or

5. A civil action brought under Section 5 of this act arising
from an officer-director, employee-employer, or independent
contractor relationship that:
a. seeks recovery for misappropriation of trade secrets
or corporate opportunities, or
b. seeks to enforce a non-disparagement agreement,
covenant not to compete, non-disclosure agreement, or
confidentiality agreement.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1777 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1777 Page 3